Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Public Service Work Programs

§ 47-5-401.
Public service work programs; eligibility; limitation.

There is hereby authorized, in each county of the state, a public service work program for state inmates in custody of the county. Such a program may be established at the option of the county in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421. The department shall also recommend rules and regulations concerning the participation of state inmates in the program.

An inmate shall not be eligible to participate in a work program established in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 if he has been convicted of any crime of violence, including but not limited to murder, aggravated assault, rape, robbery or armed robbery.

The inmates participating in the work program established in accordance with the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 are restricted to the performance of public service work for counties, municipalities, the state or nonprofit charitable organizations, as defined by Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, except that the Department of Corrections must approve all requests by nonprofit charitable organizations to use offenders to perform any public service work. Upon request of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or the board of trustees of a county school district, municipal school district or junior college district, the inmates may be permitted to perform work for such boards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 2; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 89; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 89; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 31; Laws, 1992, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 393, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 47-5-403.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421, the following words and terms have the meanings hereby ascribed to them:

“County inmate” means a person convicted of a crime and sentenced to a term of confinement of one (1) year’s duration or less.

“State inmate” means a person convicted of a crime and sentenced to the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of confinement of more than one (1) year’s duration.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Corrections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 90; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 90; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-405.
Joint state-county work programs; sheriff to adopt regulations.

Each county electing to establish a work program under Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 is authorized through its sheriff to adopt regulations and policies for joint state-county work programs, including extending the limits of the place of confinement of an eligible inmate as to whom there is reasonable cause to believe he will know his trust.

Any rules, regulations or policies promulgated by the sheriff shall be filed with the board of supervisors, and shall be left on file for a minimum of thirty (30) days before any such rules, regulations or policies can be implemented or utilized for any inmate pursuant to the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421. Provided further, such rules as they pertain to state inmates shall also be submitted to the Department of Corrections for approval which shall be granted or rejected within thirty (30) days of submission. If said rules are rejected the reasons therefor shall be stated in writing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 3; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 91; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 91; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-407.
Work camps.

Any county establishing a work program pursuant to Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 may also establish a work camp to be used in carrying out the program, wherein inmates participating in the program may be housed in lieu of confinement in the county jail.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 4; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 92; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 92, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-409.
Escapes.

The willful failure of an inmate to remain within the extended limits of his confinement or to return to the place of confinement within the time prescribed shall be deemed an escape from a state penal institution in the case of a state inmate, and an escape from the custody of the sheriff in the case of a county inmate, and shall be punishable accordingly.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 5; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 93; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 93, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-411.
Criteria for public service work.

The Department of Corrections and the county shall endeavor to secure public service work for eligible inmates under Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421, subject to the following criteria:

Such work shall not result in the displacement of employed workers.

Inmates eligible for work shall not be employed to impair any existing contracts.

Exploitation of eligible inmates, in any form, is prohibited either as it might affect the community, the inmates, the Department of Corrections or the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 6; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 94; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 94; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-413.
Earned time credit.

County inmates performing public service work under Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 shall be eligible for earned time credit in the same manner as other inmates confined or detained in the county jail or other county correctional facility. State inmates performing public service work shall be eligible for earned time credit in the same manner as other inmates confined or detained in state prisons or other state correctional facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 7; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 95; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 95, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-415.
Passes and leaves.

The sheriff, in the case of county inmates and state inmates incarcerated in county jails, and the Commissioner of Corrections, in the case of state inmates incarcerated in a Mississippi Department of Corrections facility, may institute a procedure for granting passes and leaves to inmates participating under Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421, and may grant such passes or leaves in deserving cases, not to exceed three (3) days or seventy-two (72) hours.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 8; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 96; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 96; Laws, 1986, ch. 427; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-417.
Status of participating inmate.

No inmate granted privileges under the provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 shall be deemed to be an agent, employee or involuntary servant of the Department of Corrections, the state or any political subdivision thereof, while involved in the free community or while going to and from work or other specified areas or while on furlough pass.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 9; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 97; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 97; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-419.
Delegation of functions.

The sheriff may designate any officer or employee of the county to do and perform for the county any act or function Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 empower the county to do or perform; provided, however, no elected official of the county shall be designated to do or perform any act or function for the county unless such elected officer is agreeable to being so designated.

The Commissioner of Corrections may designate any employee of the State Department of Corrections to do and perform for the department any act or function Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 empower the department to do or perform.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 10; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 98; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 98; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-421.
Provisions cumulative.

The provisions of Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 are cumulative and shall not be construed to repeal or supersede any laws directly inconsistent herewith; and it is specifically provided herein that any work program in operation or functioning pursuant to any local law when Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421 become law may be continued pursuant to such local law and shall not be affected in any way by Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421. The county conducting such program may, however, at its option convert the program to a program to be governed by Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 456, § 11; brought forward, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 99; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 99, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).